Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.640

Confirmation notice—Response, auditor's action. (Effective until June 1, 2025.)

(1) If the response to the confirmation notice from the voter indicates that the voter has moved within the county, the auditor shall transfer the voter's registration and send the voter an acknowledgment notice.

(2) If the response from the voter indicates that the voter moved out of the county, but within the state, the auditor shall cancel the voter's registration and notify the county auditor of the voter's new county of residence.

(3) If the response from the voter indicates that the voter has left the state, the auditor shall cancel the voter's registration on the official state voter registration list.

[ 2009 c 369 s 33; 2004 c 267 s 132; 2003 c 111 s 243. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 46. Formerly RCW 29.10.210.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

PDFRCW 29A.08.640

Confirmation notice—Response, auditor's action. (Effective June 1, 2025.)

(1) If the response to the confirmation notice from the voter indicates that the voter has changed residence address or location within the county, the auditor shall update the voter record to reflect the new residence address within the auditor's county. If the response indicates that the voter has moved outside the county, but within the state, the auditor shall notify the county auditor of the voter's new county of residence of the change.

(2) The county auditor of the voter's new county of residence, upon receiving notice under subsection (1) of this section, shall transfer the voter's registration record to the new address and send the voter an acknowledgment notice.

(3) If the response from the voter indicates that the voter has left the state, the auditor shall cancel the voter's registration on the official state voter registration list.

[ 2024 c 56 s 3; 2009 c 369 s 33; 2004 c 267 s 132; 2003 c 111 s 243. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 46. Formerly RCW 29.10.210.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 56: See note following RCW 29A.08.410.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.